pt-BR: Variedade de bebida de vinagre: Kombucha; Oximel; Posca; Shrubs; Switchel; Tônico de vinagre; Outro
zh-CN: 醋饮料品种: 康普茶; 药蜂蜜; 波斯卡; 权木; 姜醋饮; 滋补醋饮; 其他
th: ลักษณะเครื่องดื่มผสมน้ำส้มสายชู: คอมบูชา; อ็อกซิเมล; พอสกา; ชรับส์; สวิตช์เซล; น้ำส้มสายชูโทนิก; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Raznolikost pijače s kisom: Kombuča; Oxymel; Posca; Shrub; Switchel; Tonik s kisom; Drugo
sk-SK: Odroda octových nápojov: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Shrubs; Switchel; Octový tonik; Iné
ja: お酢ドリンク各種: コンブチャ; オキシメル; ポスカ; シュラブ; スウィッチェル; ビネガートニック; その他
pt-PT: Variedade de bebida de vinagre: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Shrubs; Switchel; Tónico de vinagre; Outro
da: Eddikedrikvariant: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Buskads; Switchel; Eddiketonic; Andet
lt-LT: Acto pagrindu gaminamų gėrimų rūšis: Kambuča; Oksimelis; Posca; „Shrub“ vaisių ir acto gėrimas; Svi̇ičelis; Acto tonikas; Kita
ro-RO: Sortiment de băuturi cu oțet: Kombucha; Oximel; Posca; Shrubs; Switchel; Tonic cu oțet; Altele
ko: 식초 음료 종류: 콤부차; 옥시멜; 포스카; 관목; 스위첼; 식초 토닉; 기타
en: Vinegar drink variety: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Shrubs; Switchel; Vinegar tonic; Other
bg-BG: Разновидност на напитката с оцет: Комбуча; Оксимел; Поска; Шръб; Суичел; Тоник с оцет; Други
zh-TW: 醋飲料種類: 康普茶; 蜜醋; 波斯卡; 灌木叢; 生薑果醋蜂蜜水; 醋益生飲; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta pića na bazi octa: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Shrub; Switchel; Tonik s octom; Ostalo
fi: Etikkajuomavalikoima: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Puskat; Switchel; Etikka-tonic; Muu
nb: Eddikdrikke-variant: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Småbusker; Switchel; Eddiktonic; Annet
hu: Ecetalapú ital fajtája: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Cserjék; Switchel; Ecetes tonik; Egyéb
sv: Sort av vinägerdryck: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Shrubs; Switchel; Vinägertonic; Övrigt
ru: Разновидность напитка на основе уксуса: Комбуча; Оксимель; Поска; Shrubs; Свитчел; Уксусный тоник; Другой
de: Auswahl an Essiggetränken: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Shrubs; Switchel; Essighaltiges Tonic; Sonstiges
nl: Azijndrankvariant: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Heesters; Switchel; Azijntonicum; Andere
vi: Loại đồ uống từ giấm: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Shrub; Switchel; Vinegar tonic; Khác
pl: Odmiana napoju octowego: Kombucha; Oksymel; Posca; Krzewy; Przełącznik; Tonik octowy; Inne
es: Variedad de bebida con vinagre: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Con jarabes de fruta; Switchel; Tónico de vinagre; Otros
fr: Variété de boisson au vinaigre: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Shrub; Switchel; Tonique au vinaigre; Autre
tr: Sirkeli İçecek Çeşitleri: Kombu çayı; Oksimel; Posca; Bodur Ağaçlar; Switchel; Sirke toniği; Diğer
el: Ποικιλία ροφήματος ξυδιού: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Χαμόδενδρα; Διακόπτης; Τονωτικό ξύδι; Άλλο
it: Varietà di bevande a base di aceto: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Shrubs; Switchel; Tonico all'aceto; Altro
cs: Druh octového nápoje: Kombucha; Oxymel; Posca; Křoviny; Switchel; Octové tonikum; Jiné